external_dictionaries/vdemir/tr_TR.aff
FLAG num
SFX 19834 N 1
SFX 19834 0 meyim .
SFX 19835 N 1
SFX 19835 0 meyin .
SFX 19836 N 1
SFX 19836 0 laşmalarıyla .
SFX 19837 N 1
SFX 19837 0 lenemediler .
SFX 19838 N 1
SFX 19838 0 meyip .
SFX 19839 N 1
SFX 19839 0 dırmadık .
SFX 19840 N 1
SFX 19840 0 dırmadım .
SFX 19841 N 1
SFX 19841 0 dürdüğüne .
SFX 19842 N 1
SFX 19842 0 şememiştir .
SFX 19843 N 1
SFX 19843 0 nmaktansa .
SFX 19844 N 1
SFX 19844 0 meyiz .
SFX 19846 N 1
SFX 19846 0 luluğuna .
SFX 19845 N 1
SFX 19845 0 tsan .
SFX 19848 N 1
SFX 19848 0 ıverdikleri .
SFX 19847 N 1
SFX 19847 0 tsam .
SFX 19849 N 1
SFX 19849 0 meleriniz .
SFX 19850 N 1
SFX 19850 0 tsak .
SFX 19852 N 1
SFX 19852 0 amamışsın .
SFX 19851 N 1
SFX 19851 0 uğunda .
SFX 19853 N 1
SFX 19853 0 ndirenlerin .
SFX 19855 N 1
SFX 19855 0 lüye .
SFX 19854 N 1
SFX 19854 0 yemeyince .
SFX 19857 N 1
SFX 19857 0 emeden .
SFX 19856 N 1
SFX 19856 0 tısına .
SFX 19860 N 1
SFX 19860 0 tmeliler .
SFX 19859 N 1
SFX 19859 0 larınınkiyle .
SFX 19858 N 1
SFX 19858 0 ılamayacağıydı .
SFX 19861 N 1
SFX 19861 0 luluğunu .
SFX 19863 N 1
SFX 19863 0 anlardır .
SFX 19862 N 1
SFX 19862 0 ndırmalıyız .
SFX 19864 N 1
SFX 19864 0 ndirilebileceğini .
SFX 19865 N 1
SFX 19865 0 leştirmekle .
SFX 19866 N 1
SFX 19866 0 lanabildiğini .
SFX 19867 N 1
SFX 19867 0 acağınızdan .
SFX 19868 N 1
SFX 19868 0 lanabildiğine .
SFX 19869 N 1
SFX 19869 0 ılamadığından .
SFX 19870 N 1
SFX 19870 0 leyenlerden .
SFX 19871 N 1
SFX 19871 0 lendirmiyor .
SFX 19872 N 1
SFX 19872 0 ıklık .
SFX 19874 N 1
SFX 19874 0 ümünde .
SFX 19873 N 1
SFX 19873 0 tiremeyiz .
SFX 19875 N 1
SFX 19875 0 ışılacak .
SFX 19876 N 1
SFX 19876 0 leşmemek .
SFX 19878 N 1
SFX 19878 0 lığımdır .
SFX 19877 N 1
SFX 19877 0 ıştırmalı .
SFX 19880 N 1
SFX 19880 0 'sındaki .
SFX 19879 N 1
SFX 19879 0 tamamalarına .
SFX 19881 N 1
SFX 19881 0 dırdılar .
SFX 19882 N 1
SFX 19882 0 lenişleri .
SFX 19883 N 1
SFX 19883 0 cıda .
SFX 19884 N 1
SFX 19884 0 ıştırmadan .
SFX 19885 N 1
SFX 19885 0 lanabilirse .
SFX 19887 N 1
SFX 19887 0 tirilmeyecek .
SFX 19886 N 1
SFX 19886 0 leyememektedir .
SFX 19888 N 1
SFX 19888 0 liyordu .
SFX 19891 N 1
SFX 19891 0 ınızda .
SFX 19890 N 1
SFX 19890 0 liliklerinin .
SFX 19889 N 1
SFX 19889 0 ştiremedikleri .
SFX 19894 N 1
SFX 19894 0 lenişindeki .
SFX 19893 N 1
SFX 19893 0 lendiremedi .
SFX 19892 N 1
SFX 19892 0 'dandı .
SFX 19896 N 1
SFX 19896 0 liğimizin .
SFX 19895 N 1
SFX 19895 0 latıp .
SFX 19897 N 1
SFX 19897 0 nanlarının .
SFX 19898 N 1
SFX 19898 0 latın .
SFX 19899 N 1
SFX 19899 0 ıydılar .
SFX 19900 N 1
SFX 19900 0 tmeyenler .
SFX 19902 N 1
SFX 19902 0 lendirmediklerini .
SFX 19901 N 1
SFX 19901 0 anlardaki .
SFX 19903 N 1
SFX 19903 0 masıydı .
SFX 19904 N 1
SFX 19904 0 laşırmış .
SFX 19905 N 1
SFX 19905 0 inmediğine .
SFX 19908 N 1
SFX 19908 0 ştığından .
SFX 19907 N 1
SFX 19907 0 laştırıyorlar .
SFX 19906 N 1
SFX 19906 0 lanamamasının .
SFX 19909 N 1
SFX 19909 0 inmediğini .
SFX 19910 N 1
SFX 19910 0 tmenin .
SFX 19911 N 1
SFX 19911 0 cılara .
SFX 19912 N 1
SFX 19912 0 tısında .
SFX 19913 N 1
SFX 19913 0 dırılmasını .
SFX 19915 N 1
SFX 19915 0 tmeniz .
SFX 19914 N 1
SFX 19914 0 tısını .
SFX 19916 N 1
SFX 19916 0 ilemeyecek .
SFX 19918 N 1
SFX 19918 0 dürdüğünü .
SFX 19917 N 1
SFX 19917 0 mediğindendir .
SFX 19920 N 1
SFX 19920 0 ndığımızı .
SFX 19919 N 1
SFX 19919 0 ulmasıydı .
SFX 19921 N 1
SFX 19921 0 meyen .
SFX 19923 N 1
SFX 19923 0 sısınız .
SFX 19922 N 1
SFX 19922 0 tılıyordu .
SFX 19924 N 1
SFX 19924 0 masıyla .
SFX 19925 N 1
SFX 19925 0 ıştırmaya .
SFX 19926 N 1
SFX 19926 0 layabilenler .
SFX 19927 N 1
SFX 19927 0 yışla .
SFX 19928 N 1
SFX 19928 0 liğimizce .
SFX 19929 N 1
SFX 19929 0 nmezsek .
SFX 19931 N 1
SFX 19931 0 ümlerindeki .
SFX 19930 N 1
SFX 19930 0 ilebilmesinin .
SFX 19932 N 1
SFX 19932 0 lanmıyor .
SFX 19933 N 1
SFX 19933 0 laşmalarıydı .
SFX 19934 N 1
SFX 19934 0 şıklığını .
SFX 19935 N 1
SFX 19935 0 nabiliyorlar .
SFX 19936 N 1
SFX 19936 0 anına .
SFX 19937 N 1
SFX 19937 0 latacağından .
SFX 19939 N 1
SFX 19939 0 muyor .
SFX 19938 N 1
SFX 19938 0 meydi .
SFX 19940 N 1
SFX 19940 0 emedin .
SFX 19941 N 1
SFX 19941 0 liğimizde .
SFX 19942 N 1
SFX 19942 0 emedik .
SFX 19943 N 1
SFX 19943 0 layamaması .
SFX 19944 N 1
SFX 19944 0 emedim .
SFX 19945 N 1
SFX 19945 0 sileri .
SFX 19946 N 1
SFX 19946 0 nacaklarından .
SFX 19947 N 1
SFX 19947 0 laştırılırdı .
SFX 19948 N 1
SFX 19948 0 laşabilmelerine .
SFX 19949 N 1
SFX 19949 0 lıdırlar .
SFX 19951 N 1
SFX 19951 0 müşüzdür .
SFX 19950 N 1
SFX 19950 0 ılmadım .
SFX 19952 N 1
SFX 19952 0 ılırsak .
SFX 19953 N 1
SFX 19953 0 ştirebilmiş .
SFX 19954 N 1
SFX 19954 0 ılırsam .
SFX 19955 N 1
SFX 19955 0 ımmış .
SFX 19956 N 1
SFX 19956 0 tacaklar .
SFX 19958 N 1
SFX 19958 0 lüyü .
SFX 19957 N 1
SFX 19957 0 ılmadır .
SFX 19959 N 1
SFX 19959 0 ıştırırken .
SFX 19960 N 1
SFX 19960 0 dirmediğini .
SFX 19961 N 1
SFX 19961 0 cıydılar .
SFX 19963 N 1
SFX 19963 0 dirmediğine .
SFX 19962 N 1
SFX 19962 0 ilmişsin .
SFX 19964 N 1
SFX 19964 0 tirmelerinde .
SFX 19965 N 1
SFX 19965 0 tenlerin .
SFX 19967 N 1
SFX 19967 0 ulmasıyla .
SFX 19966 N 1
SFX 19966 0 şemez .
SFX 19968 N 1
SFX 19968 0 mdır .
SFX 19970 N 1
SFX 19970 0 meyişinde .
SFX 19969 N 1
SFX 19969 0 yışların .
SFX 19972 N 1
SFX 19972 0 ılmadık .
SFX 19971 N 1
SFX 19971 0 dirilemeyeceği .
SFX 19973 N 1
SFX 19973 0 tamayacağı .
SFX 19974 N 1
SFX 19974 0 lıklarınızın .
SFX 19975 N 1
SFX 19975 0 sizlerini .
SFX 19976 N 1
SFX 19976 0 ştıramadım .
SFX 19977 N 1
SFX 19977 0 meyse .
SFX 19978 N 1
SFX 19978 0 sizlerine .
SFX 19982 N 1
SFX 19982 0 ıcılığıyla .
SFX 19981 N 1
SFX 19981 0 lanmıştık .
SFX 19980 N 1
SFX 19980 0 tılmanın .
SFX 19979 N 1
SFX 19979 0 niyorduk .
SFX 19986 N 1
SFX 19986 0 duğunda .
SFX 19985 N 1
SFX 19985 0 lanmıştım .
SFX 19984 N 1
SFX 19984 0 abilene .
SFX 19983 N 1
SFX 19983 0 niyordum .
SFX 19988 N 1
SFX 19988 0 namadığını .
SFX 19987 N 1
SFX 19987 0 abilirmiş .
SFX 19989 N 1
SFX 19989 0 leyişlerini .
SFX 19990 N 1
SFX 19990 0 abileni .
SFX 19992 N 1
SFX 19992 0 liliklerinde .
SFX 19991 N 1
SFX 19991 0 nmışlıkları .
SFX 19993 N 1
SFX 19993 0 dirilmeyeceğini .
SFX 19994 N 1
SFX 19994 0 cıma .
SFX 19997 N 1
SFX 19997 0 lanmıştır .
SFX 19996 N 1
SFX 19996 0 'teydi .
SFX 19995 N 1
SFX 19995 0 şamayacaktır .
SFX 19999 N 1
SFX 19999 0 lerler .
SFX 19998 N 1
SFX 19998 0 ılmamaları .
SFX 20001 N 1
SFX 20001 0 tirilemeyeceği .
SFX 20000 N 1
SFX 20000 0 ırdınız .
SFX 20002 N 1
SFX 20002 0 dirilmeyeceğine .
SFX 20003 N 1
SFX 20003 0 lanışın .
SFX 20004 N 1
SFX 20004 0 tsin .
SFX 20006 N 1
SFX 20006 0 tmalıyız .
SFX 20005 N 1
SFX 20005 0 ulmuyor .
SFX 20007 N 1
SFX 20007 0 lanışım .
SFX 20008 N 1
SFX 20008 0 lanamadan .
SFX 20009 N 1
SFX 20009 0 laştırılamamış .
SFX 20010 N 1
SFX 20010 0 liğindeydim .
SFX 20011 N 1
SFX 20011 0 ştırılmasını .
SFX 20012 N 1
SFX 20012 0 laşacağı .
SFX 20014 N 1
SFX 20014 0 luktur .
SFX 20013 N 1
SFX 20013 0 niyordur .
SFX 20015 N 1
SFX 20015 0 ndirdiklerini .
SFX 20016 N 1
SFX 20016 0 lendirilmesin .
SFX 20017 N 1
SFX 20017 0 cına .
SFX 20018 N 1
SFX 20018 0 lendirilecektir .
SFX 20019 N 1
SFX 20019 0 siydiler .
SFX 20020 N 1
SFX 20020 0 luyorsun .
SFX 20022 N 1
SFX 20022 0 meyişinin .
SFX 20021 N 1
SFX 20021 0 dırılacağından .
SFX 20023 N 1
SFX 20023 0 tmalıyım .
SFX 20024 N 1
SFX 20024 0 lememizin .
SFX 20025 N 1
SFX 20025 0 ılmasında .
SFX 20026 N 1
SFX 20026 0 maktalar .
SFX 20027 N 1
SFX 20027 0 latıcı .
SFX 20028 N 1
SFX 20028 0 tirenler .
SFX 20029 N 1
SFX 20029 0 nememesinin .
SFX 20030 N 1
SFX 20030 0 namayanları .
SFX 20031 N 1
SFX 20031 0 sindeydiler .
SFX 20032 N 1
SFX 20032 0 lerdedir .
SFX 20033 N 1
SFX 20033 0 cıları .
SFX 20034 N 1
SFX 20034 0 dirmesinden .
SFX 20035 N 1
SFX 20035 0 dirmemeli .
SFX 20037 N 1
SFX 20037 0 ecekleri .
SFX 20036 N 1
SFX 20036 0 namayanların .
SFX 20038 N 1
SFX 20038 0 şemediğini .
SFX 20039 N 1
SFX 20039 0 selden .
SFX 20040 N 1
SFX 20040 0 ştırmayacağı .
SFX 20041 N 1
SFX 20041 0 eceklere .
SFX 20042 N 1
SFX 20042 0 tılabilmesi .
SFX 20043 N 1
SFX 20043 0 ydik .
SFX 20044 N 1
SFX 20044 0 çımız .
SFX 20045 N 1
SFX 20045 0 ydim .
SFX 20046 N 1
SFX 20046 0 sıyken .
SFX 20047 N 1
SFX 20047 0 tirmelerin .
SFX 20048 N 1
SFX 20048 0 ndığından .
SFX 20050 N 1
SFX 20050 0 amadıklarından .
SFX 20049 N 1
SFX 20049 0 ebilmelidir .
SFX 20051 N 1
SFX 20051 0 leştiremeyen .
SFX 20052 N 1
SFX 20052 0 masıysa .
SFX 20053 N 1
SFX 20053 0 yebildiğimiz .
SFX 20055 N 1
SFX 20055 0 ydin .
SFX 20054 N 1
SFX 20054 0 cından .
SFX 20056 N 1
SFX 20056 0 yenle .
SFX 20057 N 1
SFX 20057 0 nılacak .
SFX 20058 N 1
SFX 20058 0 ınızla .
SFX 20060 N 1
SFX 20060 0 tsek .
SFX 20059 N 1
SFX 20059 0 yışta .
SFX 20061 N 1
SFX 20061 0 laştırılamadı .
SFX 20063 N 1
SFX 20063 0 tıramam .
SFX 20062 N 1
SFX 20062 0 tıldıkça .
SFX 20064 N 1
SFX 20064 0 cılı .
SFX 20065 N 1
SFX 20065 0 iştiği .
SFX 20066 N 1
SFX 20066 0 tıramaz .
SFX 20067 N 1
SFX 20067 0 lüsü .
SFX 20068 N 1
SFX 20068 0 ulacağına .
SFX 20069 N 1
SFX 20069 0 şmeden .
SFX 20070 N 1
SFX 20070 0 yenin .
SFX 20071 N 1
SFX 20071 0 ıyorsanız .
SFX 20072 N 1
SFX 20072 0 işecek .
SFX 20074 N 1
SFX 20074 0 liğimizle .
SFX 20073 N 1
SFX 20073 0 ndırabileceğini .
SFX 20075 N 1
SFX 20075 0 ştırmıştı .
SFX 20077 N 1
SFX 20077 0 ışmalarında .
SFX 20076 N 1
SFX 20076 0 letilmiş .
SFX 20079 N 1
SFX 20079 0 laştırılırsa .
SFX 20078 N 1
SFX 20078 0 ştırılmasına .
SFX 20080 N 1
SFX 20080 0 cadaki .
SFX 20081 N 1
SFX 20081 0 uşu .
SFX 20082 N 1
SFX 20082 0 suzlaştırma .
SFX 20083 N 1
SFX 20083 0 üyken .
SFX 20085 N 1
SFX 20085 0 uşlarında .
SFX 20084 N 1
SFX 20084 0 lanabiliyorsa .
SFX 20086 N 1
SFX 20086 0 lanabileceğiniz .
SFX 20087 N 1
SFX 20087 0 meyle .
SFX 20088 N 1
SFX 20088 0 ebilesiniz .
SFX 20089 N 1
SFX 20089 0 lanabileceğinin .
SFX 20091 N 1
SFX 20091 0 uşa .
SFX 20090 N 1
SFX 20090 0 nmamaktadır .
SFX 20092 N 1
SFX 20092 0 diğiydi .
SFX 20093 N 1
SFX 20093 0 meyegörsün .
SFX 20095 N 1
SFX 20095 0 seldir .
SFX 20094 N 1
SFX 20094 0 yamadığımızdan .
SFX 20097 N 1
SFX 20097 0 ştıramadık .
SFX 20096 N 1
SFX 20096 0 mayanlardır .
SFX 20098 N 1
SFX 20098 0 çuklar .
SFX 20099 N 1
SFX 20099 0 lettirdikleri .
SFX 20100 N 1
SFX 20100 0 olsun .
SFX 20100 N 1
SFX 20100 0 dıracaklarını .
SFX 20101 N 1
SFX 20101 0 ilecekleri .
SFX 20102 N 1
SFX 20102 0 ılacağınızı
SFX 20103 N 1
SFX 20103 0 ettik
SFX 20104 N 1
SFX 20104 0 etmeyin
SFX 20105 N 1
SFX 20105 0 ediyor
SFX 20106 N 1
SFX 20106 0 edilen
SFX 20107 N 1
SFX 20107 0 'yı .
SFX 20108 N 1
SFX 20108 0 inin .
SFX 20109 N 1
SFX 20109 0 im .
SFX 20110 N 1
SFX 20110 0 imiz .
SFX 20111 N 1
SFX 20111 0 -i .
SFX 20112 N 1
SFX 20112 0 ettiğimiz .
SFX 20113 N 1
SFX 20113 0 edildikleri .
SFX 20114 N 1
SFX 20114 0 inizim .
SFX 20115 N 1
SFX 20115 0 'nunla .
SFX 20116 N 1
SFX 20116 0 'dur .
SFX 20117 N 1
SFX 20117 0 yemeyene .
SFX 20118 N 1
SFX 20118 0 ğe .
SFX 20119 N 1
SFX 20119 0 'tır .
SFX 20120 N 1
SFX 20120 0 meğe .
SFX 20121 N 1
SFX 20121 0 dıklarınızdan .
SFX 20122 N 1
SFX 20122 0 lerindedirler .
SFX 20123 N 1
SFX 20123 0 'tir .
SFX 20124 N 1
SFX 20124 0 'nundur .
SFX 20125 N 1
SFX 20125 0 ülmeğe .
SFX 20126 N 1
SFX 20126 0 etmiştir .
